Utah statutes.
58-40-301.   Licensure required -- License classifications.

(1)  A license is required to engage in the practice of recreational therapy, except as specifically provided in Section 58-40-305 or 58-1-307.

(2)  The division shall issue to a person who qualifies under this chapter a license in the classification of:

(a)  master therapeutic recreation specialist;

(b)  therapeutic recreation specialist; or

(c)  therapeutic recreation technician.

